Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1764.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; CULTURAL EXCHANGES INVOLVING DIVERSE MINNESOTA COMMUNITIES.new text end new text begin $....... in fiscal year 2026 and $....... in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the arts and cultural heritage fund to the commissioner of administration for a grant to the city of St. Paul to plan and host cultural exchange events celebrating the relationship between diverse communities in the host city and its sister cities in Southeast Asia. new text end